Hawaii statutes.
§711-1110.9 Violation of privacy in the
first degree. (1) A person commits the offense of violation of privacy in
the first degree if, except in the execution of a public duty or as authorized
by law:

(a) The person intentionally or knowingly installs
or uses, or both, in any private place, without consent of the person or
persons entitled to privacy therein, any device for observing, recording,
amplifying, or broadcasting another person in a stage of undress or sexual
activity in that place; or

(b) The person knowingly discloses an image or video
of another identifiable person either in the nude, as defined in section
712-1210, or engaging in sexual conduct, as defined in section 712-1210,
without the consent of the depicted person, with intent to harm substantially
the depicted person with respect to that person's health, safety, business,
calling, career, financial condition, reputation, or personal relationships;
provided that:

(i) This paragraph shall not apply to images
or videos of the depicted person made:

(A) When the person was voluntarily nude in
public or voluntarily engaging in sexual conduct in public; or

(B) Pursuant to a voluntary commercial
transaction; and

(ii) Nothing in this paragraph shall be
construed to impose liability on a provider of "electronic communication
service" or "remote computing service" as those terms are
defined in section 803-41, for an image or video disclosed through the
electronic communication service or remote computing service by another person.

(2) Violation of privacy in the first degree
is a class C felony. In addition to any penalties the court may impose, the
court may order the destruction of any recording made in violation of this
section. [L 1999, c 278, §1; am L 2003, c 48, §3; am L 2004, c 83, §2; am L
2014, c 116, §1]

COMMENTARY ON §711-1110.9

Act 278, Session Laws 1999, added this section to make it a
felony to take sexual photographs or videotapes of a person without that
person's consent and when the person expects privacy. The legislature found
that current laws criminalizing a violation of privacy do not distinguish
between surreptitious recording of any events and sounds in a private place,
and the more egregious offense of installing a hidden device to surreptitiously
record or observe persons while they are undressed or engaging in sexual
activity. The legislature believed that using a hidden device to record
someone while engaged in very personal acts merits a higher penalty than simply
using a hidden device to record any events in a private place. Senate Standing
Committee Report No. 1579, Conference Committee Report No. 87.

Act 48, Session Laws 2003, amended this section to update the
crime of violation of privacy in the first degree to punish "video
voyeurism" in public places. The legislature found that through
technological advancements, recording and broadcasting devices are easily
concealed. Incidents of "video voyeurism" in public places have
occurred but are not chargeable under existing laws. Changing the offense of
violation of privacy would address the growing concern for the offensive
practice of "upskirt photography." Senate Standing Committee Report
No. 637, House Standing Committee Report No. 1316.

Act 83, Session Laws 2004, amended this section to clarify
that the offense of violation of privacy in the first degree included the use
or installation, or both, in any private place and without the consent of the
person or persons entitled to privacy therein, of any device for observing,
recording, amplifying, or broadcasting another person in a stage of undress or
sexual activity in that place. House Standing Committee Report No. 1174-04.

Act 116, Session Laws 2014, expanded the offense of violation
of privacy in the first degree to include knowingly disclosing an image or
video of another identifiable person either in the nude or engaging in sexual
conduct without the consent of the depicted person with intent to harm
substantially the depicted person. Act 116 also provided immunity for: (1)
the distribution of images or videos made of the depicted person while
voluntarily nude or voluntarily engaging in sexual conduct in public, or
pursuant to a voluntary commercial transaction; and (2) the providers of
electronic communication service or remote computing service for images or
videos disclosed through the service by another person. The legislature found
that California legislation that was signed into law in 2013 prohibited a
"revenge porn" perpetrator from distributing sexually explicit pictures
that were intended to be private. A number of other states have since
considered similar legislation. Advancements in cellular and internet
technology have made it easy to disseminate and access intimate images, videos,
and recordings that depict an individual in the nude or engaged in sexual
activity. These images and recordings can be used to retaliate against the
depicted individual. Act 116 addressed the concerns and ramifications of the
dissemination of a representation of nude person or, of a person engaging in
sexual conduct without the depicted person's consent by making the
dissemination a criminal offense. Conference Committee Report No. 29-14,
Senate Standing Committee Report No. 3162.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next